District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-1706

Citizen Advisory Committee.

Repealed.

Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-143, § 7, 29 DCR 3118
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-235, § 2, 48 DCR 593
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 257, 62 DCR 1884

History

1981 Ed., § 1-2806.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 13-235 substituted “resident” for “Advisory Neighborhood Commissioner”.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 257 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 257 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).

Emergency Legislation